Wyoming, session 2026, HB0071.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 40-10-137 is created to read:

40-10-137. Penny rounding; rounding requirements for
cash payments; exclusions; applicability.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter, if a person makes a sale in commerce and the
HB0071

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0309
purchaser offers to pay in cash, the final amount of the
sale may be rounded if the seller cannot make exact change
for the purchase due to the unavailability of pennies. Any
rounding conducted under this subsection shall be as
follows:

(i) Except as provided in paragraph (iii) of
this subsection, if the final amount of the sale ends in
one cent ($0.01), two cents ($0.02), six cents ($0.06) or
seven cents ($0.07), the amount of the sale shall be
rounded down to the nearest five cents ($0.05);

(ii) If the final amount of the sale ends in
three cents ($0.03), four cents ($0.04), eight cents
($0.08) or nine cents ($0.09), the final amount of the sale
shall be rounded up to the nearest five cents ($0.05);

(iii) If the final amount of the sale is a total
of exactly one cent ($0.01) or two cents ($0.02), the final
amount of the sale shall be rounded up to five cents
($0.05);

HB0071

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0309
(iv) If the final amount of the sale ends in
zero cents ($0.00) or five cents ($0.05), the final amount
of the sale shall not be rounded.

(b) The amount of any sales tax, use tax or any other
tax applicable to the transaction shall be added to the
amount of the sale before any rounding under this section
to determine the final amount of the sale. No rounding of
the final amount of the sale under this section shall
affect the amount of tax due on the transaction.

(c) If a seller operating out of a commercial
premises that is open to the public is rounding
transactions as provided in this section, the seller shall
display a sign in the commercial premises indicating that
cash payments that are not in exact change will be subject
to rounding.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
nothing in this section shall be construed to permit any
rounding for purchases by credit, debit, check, cash paid
in exact change or any other payment that is not a cash
payment or that does not require change to be paid in cash.
HB0071

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0309
Supplemental nutrition assistance program purchases shall
only be rounded to the extent necessary to comply with
federal law.

(e) This section shall not apply to the extent it
conflicts with any rounding requirements that are enacted
by federal law.

Section 2. W.S. 40-10-117(b)(xxxi) and
40-10-122(a)(xviii)(A) are amended to read:

40-10-117. Definitions.

(b) As used in this chapter:

(xxxi) "This act" or "this chapter" means W.S.
40-10-117 through 40-10-136 40-10-137.

40-10-122. Powers and duties of the director.

(a) The director shall:

HB0071

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0309
(xviii) Verify advertised prices, price
representations and point-of-sale systems, as necessary to
determine:

(A) The accuracy of prices and
computations, including computations for rounding of cash
transactions as provided by W.S. 40-10-137, and proper use
of the equipment; and

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0071